Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
STANDARDS AND SCHEDULES

§329-11 Authority to schedule controlled
substances. (a) Annually, upon the convening of each regular session of
the state legislature, the department of public safety shall report to the
legislature additions, deletions, or revisions in the schedules of substances
enumerated in sections 329-14, 329-16, 329-18, 329-20, and 329-22, and any
other recommendations that it deems necessary. Three months prior to the
convening of each regular session, the department of public safety shall post
public notice, at the state capitol and in the office of the lieutenant
governor for public inspection, of the department's recommendations to the
legislature concerning any additions, deletions, or revisions in these
schedules; provided that the posting shall not be required if official notice
has been received that the substance has been added, deleted, or rescheduled as
a controlled substance under federal law. In making a determination regarding
a substance, the department of public safety shall assess the degree of danger
or probable danger of the substance by considering the following:

(1) The actual or probable abuse of the substance
including:

(A) Its history and current pattern of abuse;

(B) The scope, duration, and significance of
abuse; and

(C) A judgment of the degree of actual or
probable detriment that may result from the abuse of the substance;

(2) The biomedical hazard of the substance including:

(A) Its pharmacology: the effects and
modifiers of effects of the substance;

(B) Its toxicology: the acute and chronic
toxicity, interaction with other substances whether controlled or not, and
liability to psychic or physiological dependence;

(C) Risk to public health and particular
susceptibility of segments of the population; and

(D) Existence of therapeutic alternatives for
substances that are or may be used for medical purposes;

(3) A judgment of the probable physical and social
impact of widespread abuse of the substance;

(4) Whether the substance is an immediate precursor
of a substance already controlled under this part; and

(5) The current state of scientific knowledge
regarding the substance.

(b) After considering the factors enumerated
in subsection (a), the department of public safety shall make a recommendation
to the legislature, specifying to what schedule the substance should be added,
deleted, or rescheduled if it finds that the substance has a degree of danger
or probable danger. The department of public safety may make its
recommendation to the legislature prior to the submission of its annual report,
in which case the department of public safety shall publish and give notice to
the public of the recommendation.

(c) If the legislature designates a substance
as an immediate precursor, substances that are precursors of the controlled
precursor shall not be subject to control solely because they are precursors of
the controlled precursor.

(d) If a substance is added, deleted, or
rescheduled as a controlled substance under federal law and notice of the
designation is given to the department of public safety, the department of
public safety shall recommend that a corresponding change in Hawaii law be
made. The department of public safety shall similarly designate the substance
as added, deleted, or rescheduled under this chapter, after the expiration of
thirty days from publication in the Federal Register of a final order, and this
change shall have the effect of law. If a substance is added, deleted, or
rescheduled under this subsection, the control shall be temporary and, if the
next regular session of the state legislature has not made the corresponding
changes in this chapter, the temporary designation of the added, deleted, or
rescheduled substance shall be nullified.

(e) The
administrator may make an emergency scheduling by placing a substance into
schedule I, II, III, IV, or V on a temporary basis, if the administrator
determines the action is necessary to address or avoid a current or imminent
danger to the health and safety of the public. In making the determination of
whether to emergency schedule a substance, the administrator shall assess the
degree of danger or probable danger of the substance by considering the
following:

(1) The actual or possible abuse of the substance including:

(A) Its history and current pattern of abuse;

(B) The scope, duration, and significance of
abuse; and

(C) A judgment of the degree of actual or
possible detriment that may result from the abuse of the substance; and

(2) The risk to public health.

The department shall post a public notice thirty
days prior to the effective date of the emergency scheduling action, at the
state capitol, in the office of the lieutenant governor, and on the
department's website for public inspection. If a substance is added or
rescheduled under this subsection, the control shall be temporary and, if the
next regular session of the state legislature has not enacted the corresponding
changes in this chapter, the temporary designation of the added or rescheduled
substance shall be nullified. [L 1972, c 10, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 113, §1; am
L 1990, c 281, §10; am L 1997, c 280, §1 and c 356, §6; am L 2013, c 68, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next